Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 35 Public Utilities

11-35-1.
Consent of property owner required for electric lines — Tree-trimming — Removal on notice.

No person shall place any electric wire, apparatus, pole, bracket, insulator, or other device or appliance for the purpose of conducting currents of electricity upon any private property without the consent of the owners or of the agent of the owners; nor shall any electric wire, apparatus, pole, bracket, insulator, or other device or appliance for the purpose of conducting currents of electricity be passed through or affixed to any tree useful for shade or ornamental purposes, nor shall a tree be cut, trimmed, or interfered with, except under the direction and immediate supervision of the surveyor of highways in whose district the tree is located; provided, that any owner or agent may give notice in writing to the person or corporation owning any electric wire, apparatus, pole, bracket, insulator, or other device or appliance for the purpose of conducting currents of electricity when it shall have been so placed with the consent of the owner or agent, to remove it or any of them from any private property within thirty (30) days after the delivery of the notice, and that, in default of the removal in accordance with the terms of the notice, the owner or agent may remove them or any of them.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 56; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 59; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 59; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 67; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-1

.

11-35-2.
Badges of telegraph and telephone workers.

No person shall labor upon the work of erecting or repairing any telegraph or telephone line belonging to any telegraph or telephone company without having conspicuously attached to his or her dress a medal or badge, on which shall be legibly inscribed the name of the owners by whom he or she is employed, and a number by which he or she can be readily identified.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 56; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 59; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 59; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 67; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-2

.

11-35-3.
Penalty for violating §§ 11-35-1, 11-35-2.

Every person who shall violate any of the provisions of §§

11-35-1

and

11-35-2

shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 57; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 60; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 60; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 68; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-3

.

11-35-4.
Injuries to electric or communication lines.

Every person who shall wantonly or willfully and maliciously cut, destroy, break down, or injure, or attempt to cut, destroy, break down, or injure any machine, appliance, or apparatus used for generating electric currents or any electric wire or other appliance or apparatus used for the purpose of conducting or transmitting electric currents for using and furnishing power, motive power, light, or heat, or used for the purpose of transmitting intelligence by means of telegraphic or telephonic apparatus or by means of fire-alarm signals, burglar-alarm signals, police signals, railway signals, or other apparatus or appliance for the transmission of intelligence, or shall cut, destroy, break down, or injure or shall attempt to cut, destroy, break down, or injure any pole, bracket, insulator or other device, apparatus, or appliance for supporting or carrying any electric wire, or shall do any other act interrupting or intended to interrupt the transmission of the electric current over any electric wire, shall be liable to indictment for it, and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding three thousand dollars ($3,000) or imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or permit the attachment, erection, use, operation, or maintenance of any electric wire, apparatus, pole, bracket, insulator, or other device or appliance, upon the property of any person or corporation, without the consent of the owner or owners; nor to prevent any properly authorized person from removing any electric wire, apparatus, pole, bracket, insulator, or other device or appliance for the purpose of permitting the passage of any building or structure, the moving of which has been duly authorized by any city or town council.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 61; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 64; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 64; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 73; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-4

.

11-35-4.1.
Installation of live wires or electrical equipment.

Whoever being engaged in the business of transmitting electricity or installing or repairing live wires or electrical equipment knowingly permits a journeyperson line worker, while on a pole or structure, to work on live wires in excess of seven hundred and fifty (750) volts to ground unless he or she is assisted on or at the base of each pole or structure by a journeyperson line worker, a second year apprentice, or a line worker having a title commonly accepted as the equivalent of the foregoing, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Each violation of this section shall be a separate offense.

This section shall not apply to work done by any person who is commonly called a troubleshooter, who would be employed in the performance of making emergency repairs, locating electrical faults, clearing defective apparatus, and answering service calls.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 195, § 1.

11-35-5.
Aiding, abetting, counseling, or procuring line injuries.

Every person who shall aid, assist, abet, counsel, hire, command, or procure any person to do or attempt any of the acts mentioned in §

11-35-4

shall be subject to like fine or imprisonment as provided in that section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 62; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 65; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 65; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 74; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-5

.

11-35-6.
Interference with gas or electric or water meters.

Every person who shall willfully or fraudulently injure or shall knowingly suffer to be injured any wire, meter, pipe, or fittings connected with or belonging to any electric company or gaslight company or connected with or belonging to the waterworks of any corporation in this state supplying water at a stipulated rate of payment, or shall willfully tamper or meddle with any other of the appliances or appurtenances connected with or belonging to any electric company or gaslight company or to the waterworks of a corporation in a manner as to cause loss or damage to the company or corporation, or who shall willfully or fraudulently prevent any meter used for registering the quantity of electricity, gas, or water supplied through it from duly registering the quantity so passing through it, or alter the index of any meter or in any way hinder or interfere with its proper action or just registration, or shall fraudulently use the electricity or fraudulently burn the gas of the company or fraudulently use the water passing through the wire, meter, pipe, fittings, or other of the appliances or appurtenances connected with or belonging to the electric company or gas company or to the waterworks of the corporation, or willfully waste electricity, gas, or water, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000). In any prosecution under this section proof that any wire, meter, pipe, or fittings have been injured, or that any meter has been prevented from duly registering the quantity of electricity, gas, or water supplied through it, while on the premises occupied by the defendant, shall be prima facie evidence that the defendant caused the injury or prevented the meter from duly registering the quantity of electricity, gas, or water supplied through it, willfully and fraudulently and with intent to injure or defraud.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 48; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 51; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 51; P.L. 1930, ch. 1620, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 57; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-6

; P.L. 1986, ch. 544, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 152, § 1.

11-35-7.
Bypassing meters — Use of electricity, gas or water with intent to defraud.

Every person who, with intent to injure or defraud any gaslight company or any electric company, or corporation supplying water in this state at a stipulated rate of payment, shall make or cause to be made any wire, pipe, tube, or other instrument or contrivance, and connect it or cause it to be connected with any main, service pipe, or other pipe, appliance, or appurtenance used for or in connection with the works or apparatus employed for conducting or supplying electricity, illuminating gas, or water, in any manner that is calculated to supply electricity, gas, or water to any burner, orifice, faucet, or other outlet whatsoever, without the electricity, gas, or water passing through a meter provided or used for measuring or registering its quantity so passing through, or without the consent of the company or corporation to the connections, or who shall otherwise use any electricity, gas, or water with the intent to defraud the company or corporation of payment, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000). In any prosecution under this section, proof that any of the acts specified in this section were done on or about the premises occupied by the defendant, or proof of the presence on or about the premises, of any device which affects the diversion of electricity, gas, or water without it being measured or registered by the meter provided, shall be prima facie evidence that the defendant committed the acts, or aided or abetted in their commission, maliciously and with intent to injure or defraud.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 49; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 52; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 52; P.L. 1930, ch. 1620, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-7

; P.L. 1986, ch. 544, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 152, § 1.

11-35-8.
Interference with electric meter.

Every person who shall willfully or fraudulently injure, or shall knowingly suffer to be injured, any meter, or any wire, fittings, or appliances connected with any meter belonging to any corporation furnishing electric current for light, heat, power, or other purposes at a stipulated rate of payment, or shall willfully tamper or meddle with any other of the appliances or appurtenances connected with any meter belonging to any corporation, in any manner as to cause loss or damage to the corporation, or who shall willfully or fraudulently prevent any meter used for registering the quantity of the electric current supplied through it from duly registering the quantity so passing through it or alter the index in the meter, or in any way hinder or interfere with its proper action or just registration, or shall fraudulently use the electric current of the corporation passing through the meter, wire, fittings, or other of the appliances or appurtenances connected with or belonging to the corporation, or willfully waste electric current, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500). In any prosecution under this section proof that any meter, or any wire, fitting, appliance, or appurtenance connected with it, has been injured, or tampered, or meddled with, or that any meter has been prevented from duly registering the quantity of electric current supplied through it, while on the premises occupied by the defendant, shall be prima facie evidence that the defendant caused the injury or tampered or meddled with the meter, wire, fitting, appliance, or appurtenance, or prevented the meter from duly registering the quantity of electric current supplied through it, willfully and fraudulently and with intent to injure or defraud.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 63; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 66; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 66; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 59; P.L. 1940, ch. 948, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-8

.

11-35-9.
Bypassing electric meter — Use of electricity with intent to defraud.

Every person who, with intent to injure or defraud any person, persons, association, or corporation generating, conducting, using, or supplying the electric current, either for the purposes of his, her, its or their own business or for the purpose of selling the electric current at a stipulated rate of payment, shall make or cause to be made any wire or other instrument or contrivance and connect it or cause it to be connected with any electric wire, appliance, apparatus or appurtenance used for or in connection with the wires or apparatus employed for generating, conducting, using, or supplying electric current, in any manner that is calculated either to waste and dissipate the electric current or to supply the electric current to any lamp, burner, heater, machine, motor or other apparatus or appliance whatsoever, without the electric current passing through a meter provided by the person, persons, association, or corporation and used for registering the quantity so passing through, or without the consent of the person, persons, association, or corporation to the connections, or who shall otherwise use any electric current with the intent to defraud the person, persons, association or corporation of payment, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500). In any prosecution under this section proof that any of the acts specified in this section was done on or about the premises occupied by the defendant, or proof of the presence on or about the premises of any wire or other instrument or contrivance which effects the waste or dissipation or the diversion of electric current without the electric current being measured or registered by a meter provided for it or without the consent of the person, persons, association, or corporation, shall be prima facie evidence that the defendant committed the acts, or aided or abetted in their commission, maliciously and with intent to injure or defraud.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 60; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 67; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 67; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 60; P.L. 1940, ch. 948, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-9

.

11-35-10.
Excessive gas or water charges — False meters.

Every person or corporation who shall willfully collect of any person or persons a larger sum for gas or water than appears to be due on inspection of the meter put in to regulate and register it, or shall willfully furnish a meter that shall not correctly register the quantity of gas or water consumed, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 50; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 53; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 53; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 61; G.L. 1956, §

11-35-10

.

11-35-11 — 11-35-13.
Repealed.

11-35-14.
Refusal to relinquish or to damage or to obstruct telephone.

Any person who willfully refuses to relinquish a party line or who obstructs or damages an individual telephone line or telephone set when he or she knows or should have known that the party line, individual telephone line or telephone set is needed for an emergency call to a fire department or police department or for medical aid or ambulance service shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300) or be imprisoned ninety (90) days, or both, or any person who secures the use of a party line by falsely stating that the line is needed for an emergency call shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months.

As used in this section:

“Party line” means a subscriber line telephone circuit consisting of two (2) or more main telephone stations connected with it, each station with a distinctive ring or telephone number; and

“Emergency” means a situation in which property or human life are in jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 346, § 1.

11-35-15.
Notice on telephone book.

A copy of §

11-35-14

, preceded by the word “Warning” in large type, shall be printed in a prominent place in every telephone directory distributed to the members of the general public in this state or in any portion of it after June 1, 1958, which lists the calling numbers of telephones of any telephone exchange located in this state; provided, the provisions of this section shall not apply to those directories distributed solely for business advertising purposes, commonly known as classified directories.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 145, § 1.

11-35-16.
Wrongfully obtaining telecommunication service.

Any person who, with intent to injure or defraud any person, persons, association, or corporation furnishing telecommunications service of the whole or any part of the lawful charge for any service, obtains, attempts to obtain, or aids or abets another in obtaining any telecommunications service by any false representation, false statement, or stratagem, by the unauthorized charging to the account of another, by installing or tampering with any facilities or equipment or by any other means, commits a criminal offense and shall be subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(a)

, if the value of or the charges for the service obtained in violation of this section does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six (6) month period, or be subject to the penalties set forth in §

11-49-10(b)

, if the value of or the charges for the service exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any six (6) month period; provided, that this section shall not apply to conduct constituting a violation of the provisions of §

11-18-21

.

As used in this section, “telecommunication service” includes the transmission of any video, audio, or other signal by a community antenna television system licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 19 of title 39.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 316, § 1.

11-35-17.
Crank or obscene telephone calls.

Whoever shall originate a transmission by facsimile machine, or other telecommunication device or shall telephone any person repeatedly or cause any person to be telephoned repeatedly for the sole purpose of harassing, annoying, or molesting the other person or his or her family, whether or not conversation ensues; or whoever shall originate a transmission by facsimile machine, or other telecommunication device or shall telephone any person for the purpose of using any threatening, vulgar, indecent, obscene, or immoral language over the telephone, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

This section shall not be construed to impose any liability upon providers of telecommunications services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 278, § 1.

11-35-18.
Bomb threats and similar false reports.

Whoever, knowing the report to be false, transmits or causes to be transmitted to any person by telephone or other means a communication falsely reporting the location of any explosive or other dangerous substance or contrivance, causing anxiety, unrest, fear, or personal discomfort by that false report to any person or group of persons, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment at the adult correctional institutions for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 195, § 1.

11-35-19.
Prosecution for violations of §§ 11-35-17, 11-35-18.

The crimes described in §§

11-35-17

and

11-35-18

may be prosecuted and punished in the territorial jurisdiction in which the communication originates or is received.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 195, § 1.

11-35-20.
Termination of service.

Every person or corporation who shall willfully for non-payment of charges cut off, discontinue, or otherwise terminate gas, electric, water, telephone, light, heat, or power service to any domestic or institutional user on either Friday, Saturday, or Sunday or at any time when the office of the person or corporation is not open for business or the day before any legal holiday shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 38, § 1.

11-35-20.1.
Wrongful termination or disruption of service.

Any person who has been served an order issued pursuant to chapter 8.1 of title 8, or chapters 5 or 15 of title 15 who causes the interruption of any utility service by false presentation or other means at the residence of the person(s) protected by a protective order issued pursuant to chapter 8.1 of title 8, or chapters 5 or 15 of title 15 shall constitute harassment.

Any person subject to an order issued pursuant to chapter 8.1 of title 8, or chapters 5 or 15 of title 15 who wishes to remove their name from a utility bill and terminate their future financial responsibility for making payments on that bill must first seek approval from the court that issued the protective order.

The court shall not allow any person, upon his or her own motion, to remove his or her name from a utility bill and terminate their financial responsibility with respect to the utility bill without first ensuring that the preexisting balance owed to the utility has been satisfied and that the person(s) covered by the protective order is able to establish an account under his or her own name without the need to make a deposit that causes hardship, and is capable of fulfilling their financial obligations towards the utility in the future.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a person protected by an order issued pursuant to chapter 8.1 of title 8, or chapters 5 or 15 of title 15 from transferring a utility bill into his or her name and assuming any and all obligations to the utility.

Any person who shall wrongfully terminate or disrupt any utility service in violation of this section shall be guilty of a violation and subject to a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 448, § 1.

11-35-21.
Unauthorized interception, disclosure or use of wire, electronic, or oral communication.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in chapter 5.1 of title 12, any person: (1) who willfully intercepts, attempts to intercept, or procures any other person to intercept or attempt to intercept, any wire, electronic, or oral communication; (2) who willfully discloses or attempts to disclose to any person the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication, knowing, or having reason to know that the information was obtained through interception of a wire, electronic, or oral communication in violation of this section; or (3) who willfully uses or attempts to use the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication, knowing, or having reason to know, that the information was obtained through interception of a wire, electronic, or oral communication in violation of this section; shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years.

The provisions of subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication, or evidence derived from those contents, which has become common knowledge or public information.

It shall not be unlawful under this chapter for:

An operator of a switchboard, or an officer, agent, or employee of a communication common carrier, whose facilities are used in the transmission of a wire, electronic, or oral communication, to intercept, disclose, or use that communication in the normal course of his or her employment while engaged in any activity which is a necessary incident to the rendition of his or her service or to the protection of the rights or property of the carrier of the communication. No communication common carrier shall utilize service observing or random monitoring except for mechanical or service quality control checks;

A person acting under color of law to intercept a wire, electronic, or oral communication, where that person is a party to the communication, or where one of the parties to the communication has given prior consent to the interception; or

A person not acting under color of law to intercept a wire, electronic, or oral communication, where the person is a party to the communication, or one of the parties to the communication has given prior consent to the interception unless the communication is intercepted for the purpose of committing any criminal or tortious act in the violation of the constitution or laws of the United States or of any state or for the purpose of committing any other injurious act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55 § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 1.

Participant Monitoring.

Participant monitoring of phone conversations does not entail a significant invasion of privacy so as to violate

R.I. Const., art. 1, § 6

. State v. Ahmadjian, 438 A.2d 1070,

1981 R.I. LEXIS 1423

(R.I. 1981).

In situations where an individual consents to having his communications monitored, subsection (c)(2) of this section, and not chapter 5.1 of title 12, applies. State v. Ahmadjian, 438 A.2d 1070,

1981 R.I. LEXIS 1423

(R.I. 1981).

11-35-22.
Offenses in connection with authorized interception of communications.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in chapter 5.1 of title 12, any person: (1) who willfully edits, alters, or tampers with any tape, transcription, or other sound recording, or knows of the editing, altering, or tampering, and presents the recording in any judicial proceeding or proceeding under oath, without fully indicating the nature of the changes made and the original state of the recording; or (2) who willfully discloses to any person any information concerning or contained in the application for or the granting or denial of orders for interception, renewals, notice, or return on an ex parte order granted pursuant to this section, or the contents of any document, tape, or recording kept in accordance with chapter 5.1 of title 12; shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 3.

11-35-23.
Failure to report to law enforcement officers.

An employee of any communication common carrier who has knowledge obtained during the course of that employment of any violation of this chapter and willfully fails to report that knowledge within seven (7) days to the attorney general shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 3.

11-35-24.
Possession, sale, distribution, manufacture and advertising of intercepting device.

Any person who willfully and knowingly possesses, sells, distributes, manufactures, assembles, or places in any publication any advertisement of, an intercepting device, the design of which renders it primarily useful for the purpose of the surreptitious interception of a wire or oral communication shall be imprisoned not more than five (5) years and fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

It shall not be unlawful under this section for a communication common carrier or an officer, agent, or employee of, or a person under contract with, a communication common carrier, in the usual course of the communication common carrier’s business, or a person under contract with the United States or a state or a political subdivision of it, or an officer, agent, or employee of a state or a political subdivision of it, to possess, sell, distribute, manufacture, assemble, or advertise any intercepting device, while acting in furtherance of the appropriate activities of the United States or a state or political subdivision of it or a communication common carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 3.

11-35-25.
Fraudulent communication devices.

It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully make, manufacture, assemble, possess, possess with intent to sell, sell, give, or otherwise transfer to another, or offer or place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement to sell, give, or otherwise transfer to another or purchase or in any other manner obtain, receive, or conceal any electronic, mechanical, or other device, instrument, apparatus, or equipment, or plans, specifications, instructions, or other information for making, manufacturing, assembling, or using any device, instrument, apparatus, or other equipment or to publish any plans, specifications, instructions, or other information with intent to use it or know or have reason to know that it is intended to be used or that its design renders it primarily useful to obtain any communication or community antenna television service from a company providing that service, by rearranging, tampering with, or making any unauthorized connection, whether physically, electronically, acoustically, inductively, or otherwise to any telephone or community antenna television instrument, equipment, or facility of any company, to avoid the payment, in whole or in part, of the lawful charge for the communication or community antenna television service or to conceal from any company or from lawful authority the existence or place of origin or termination of any communication, or by using any communication or community antenna television service knowing or having reason to know that the rearrangement, tampering, or connection existed at the time of use.

Any person who is convicted of willfully making, manufacturing, assembling, or possessing with the intent to sell, or who sells, gives or otherwise transfers to another, or offers or places in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement to sell, or give, or otherwise transfers to another any devices and/or instruments as described in this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, or fined not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.

Any person who is convicted of having possession of any devices, instruments and/or plans as described in this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, may, except as provided in this section, be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both; provided, that any person who is convicted of having possession of any devices, instruments, and/or plans relative to a community antenna television system or instruments, equipment or facilities in connection with it as described in this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 316, § 1.

11-35-26.
Automatic telephone dialing systems failing to disconnect.

Any person who operates an automatic telephone dialing system in this state which fails within five (5) seconds after the called party hangs up to automatically create a disconnect signal or an on-hook condition which allows the called party’s line to be released shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each occurrence.

As used in this section, “automatic telephone dialing system” means any automatic terminal equipment which is capable of storing numbers to be called or producing numbers to be called, using a random or sequential number generator, and with the ability to call those numbers, and which is capable of delivering a prerecorded message to the number called with or without manual assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 59, § 1.

11-35-27.
Repealed.

11-35-28.
Trespassing on utility right-of-way.

Every person who, without right, knowingly makes attachments to, or disposes on, the facilities or the rights-of-way of any electric, gas, telephone, or water utility, shall be subject to a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per incident, plus the cost of repair of the facility or right-of-way from the action. The fine shall be payable to the general fund of the municipality where the incident occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 482, § 1.

11-35-29.
Trespassing on utility property.

Every person who, without right, willfully trespasses and remains upon the land or premises of any utility, after having been forbidden to do so by the owner, agent, or the person having control over the premises of the facility, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 378, § 1.